Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 2
COUNTY AND MUNICIPAL SALES OR USE TAX

Law reviews:

For article, "Local Government Sales and Use Taxes", see 40

C

olo. Law. 61 (July 2011).

Section

29-2-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that the imposition of sales or use taxes, or both, by counties, cities, and incorporated towns in this state affects the flow of commerce within this state and the welfare of the people of this state. The purpose of the general assembly in the enactment of this article is to provide a higher degree of uniformity in any sales taxes imposed by such entities.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 660, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 138-10-1.

L. 73:

p. 1477, § 1.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 961, § 1, effective July 14.

29-2-102. Municipal sales or use tax - referendum.

Any incorporated town or city in this state may adopt a municipal sales or use tax, or both, by ordinance in accordance with the provisions of this article, but only if the ordinance provides for the submission of the tax proposal to an election by the registered electors of the town or city for their approval or rejection at a regular municipal election or at a special election called for the purpose if no regular municipal election will be held within ninety days after the adoption of the ordinance. The election shall be conducted in the manner provided in the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", article 10 of title 31, C.R.S.

No incorporated town or city shall adopt a sales or use tax ordinance pursuant to subsection (1) of this section on or after the date of the adoption of a resolution for a countywide sales tax, use tax, or both by the board of county commissioners of the county in which all or any portion of the town or city is located until after the date of the election on the county proposal.

Paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall not apply to any incorporated town or city that has been incorporated for less than five years as of the date of adoption of the sales or use tax ordinance.

Nothing in this article shall preclude the initiation of a sales or use tax proposal by the registered electors of any incorporated town or city pursuant to section 31-11-104, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 660, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 138-10-2.

L. 73:

p. 1477, § 2.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 961, § 2, effective July 14.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1126, § 1, effective April 25.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 322, § 67, effective July 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 697, § 4, effective May 4.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 440, § 25, effective May 8.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2581, § 1, effective June 5.

29-2-103. Countywide sales or use tax - multiple-county municipality excepted.

Each county in this state is authorized to levy a county sales tax, use tax, or both in accordance with the provisions of this article. No proposal for a county sales tax, use tax, or both shall become effective until approved by a majority of the registered electors of the county voting on such proposal pursuant to section 29-2-104. Such a proposal for a sales tax, use tax, or both, upon approval by a majority of the registered electors voting thereon, shall be effective throughout the incorporated and unincorporated portions of the county except when less than countywide application is authorized pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

A county may levy a sales tax, use tax, or both, in whole or in part, in less than the entire county when the following conditions are met:

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 990, § 4, effective August 5, 2008.)

The area to be excluded from the tax levy is comprised solely of a portion of a municipality whose boundaries are located in more than one county; and

All other counties in which a portion of the municipality described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2) is located have agreed to provide fair compensation to the county for any services extended to such municipality as a result of revenues derived from the county tax levy from which the municipality is excluded.

The approval provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the restrictions on contents of sales or use tax proposals set forth in section 29-2-105, and the collection procedures of section 29-2-106 shall apply to county sales or use taxes or both levied pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 660, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 138-10-3.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 962, § 3, effective July 14.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1126, § 2, effective April 25.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1028, § 1, effective May 2.

L. 2008:

(2)(a) and (2)(b) amended, p. 990, § 4, effective August 5.

29-2-103.5. Sales tax for mass transit.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), in addition to any sales tax imposed pursuant to section 29-2-103, each county in this state which lies outside the jurisdiction of the regional transportation district is authorized to levy a county sales tax, use tax, or both of up to one-half of one percent for the purpose of financing, constructing, operating, or maintaining a mass transportation system within the county.

On and after July 1, 2001, in addition to any sales tax imposed pursuant to section 29-2-103, each county in this state that lies outside the jurisdiction of the regional transportation district is authorized to levy a county sales tax, use tax, or both of up to one percent for the purpose of financing, constructing, operating, or maintaining a mass transportation system within the county.

Any county in which such mass transportation system is based may enter into intergovernmental agreements with any municipality or other county or may enter into contractual agreements with any private carrier for the purpose of providing mass transportation services either within the county or in a county in which the county mass transportation system is permitted to operate.

Any county which uses sales tax revenues which are imposed pursuant to this section for the provision of mass transportation services shall establish standards for such service.

The county shall issue a request for proposals for such service in order to compare the costs of a private carrier in providing such service with the costs of the county, as determined in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, in providing such service directly.

If the costs to the county are less when the service is provided by the private carrier, the county shall contract with the private carrier for the mass transportation service.

Any private carrier selected to provide mass transportation service pursuant to this subsection (2) shall provide such performance bond or other surety as the county may reasonably require.

In the event that no private carriers are able to provide mass transportation services, the county shall provide such services.

In contracting with a private carrier, the county shall require that the carrier not use the contract to cross-subsidize any other services provided by the carrier.

No sales tax, use tax, or both shall be levied pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section until such proposal has been referred to and approved by the registered electors of the county in accordance with the provisions of this article.

During the calendar year 1990, the proposal for a sales or use tax increase pursuant to this section may be submitted at the primary election held on the first Tuesday in August of each even-numbered year or at the next general election. For any year thereafter, such sales and use tax increase proposal may only be submitted on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each year and shall be conducted by the county clerk and recorder in accordance with the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to expand the use tax base of any county in this state as such base is described in section 29-2-109 (1).

All revenues collected from such county sales tax shall be credited to a special fund in the county treasury known as the county mass transportation fund. The fund shall be used only for the financing, constructing, operating, or maintaining of a mass transportation system within the county.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1440, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 92:

(3)(b) amended, p. 873, § 99, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 1519, § 1, effective June 8.

L. 2002:

(3)(a) amended, p. 1035, § 80, effective June 1.

L. 2008:

(3)(a) amended, p. 991, § 5, effective August 5.

29-2-103.7. Special taxes for water rights.

On and after July 1, 2003, in addition to any sales tax imposed pursuant to section 29-2-103, counties are authorized to levy a county sales tax, use tax, or any combination of such taxes of up to one percent for the purposes of purchasing, adjudicating changes of, leasing, using, banking, and selling water rights that have been adjudicated for use within such county or in a municipality or county that is subject to an intergovernmental agreement concerning such tax pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

A county may enter into an intergovernmental agreement with any municipality or other county or may enter into a contractual agreement with any private entity to facilitate the achievement of the purposes enumerated in subsection (1) of this section.

Any county that uses tax revenues imposed pursuant to this section shall establish standards for the use of such revenues.

No sales tax, use tax, or combination of such taxes shall be levied pursuant to subsection (1) of this section until a ballot proposal for the levying of such taxes has been referred to and approved by the registered electors of the county in accordance with this article.

The proposal for a tax pursuant to this section may be submitted only on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each year and shall be conducted by the county clerk and recorder in accordance with the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S.

This section shall not be construed to expand the use tax base of any county in this state, as such base is described in section 29-2-109 (1).

All revenues collected from such county taxes shall be credited to a special fund in the county treasury known as the county water fund. The county water fund shall be used only for the purposes enumerated in subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 884, § 5, effective August 6.

L. 2008:

(3)(a) amended, p. 991, § 6, effective August 5.

29-2-103.8. Sales tax for health-care services.

In addition to any sales tax imposed pursuant to section 29-2-103, each county in the state is authorized to levy a county sales tax for the purpose of providing, directly or indirectly, health-care services to residents of the county who are in need of health-care services.

Any county in which health-care services are provided may enter into intergovernmental agreements with any municipality or other county or may enter into contractual agreements with any private provider or health service district, as defined in section 32-1-103 (9), C.R.S., for the purpose of providing health-care services within the county.

Any county that uses sales tax revenues imposed pursuant to this section for the provision of health-care services shall establish standards for such services.

No sales tax shall be levied pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section until the proposal has been referred to and approved by the eligible electors of the county in accordance with the provisions of this article.

Any proposal for the levy of a sales tax in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall only be submitted to the eligible electors of the county on the date of the state general election or on the first Tuesday in November of an odd-numbered year, and any election on the proposal shall be conducted by the county clerk and recorder in accordance with the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S.

All revenues collected from a county sales tax imposed pursuant to this section shall be credited to a special fund in the county treasury known as the county health care services fund. The fund shall be used only for the purpose of providing health-care services in accordance with this section.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1200, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(3)(a) amended, p. 991, § 7, effective August 5.

29-2-103.9. Sales tax for mental health-care services.

In addition to any sales tax imposed pursuant to section 29-2-103, each county in this state is authorized to levy a county sales tax of up to one-quarter of one percent for the purpose of providing, directly or indirectly, mental health-care services to residents of the county who are in need of mental health-care services and to family members of such residents.

Any county in which mental health-care services are provided may enter into intergovernmental agreements with any municipality or other county or may enter into contractual agreements with any private provider for the purpose of providing mental health-care services within the county.

Any county that uses sales tax revenues imposed pursuant to this section for the provision of mental health-care services shall establish standards for such services.

No sales tax shall be levied pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section until the proposal has been referred to and approved by the eligible electors of the county in accordance with the provisions of this article.

Any proposal for the levy of a sales tax in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall only be submitted to the eligible electors of the county on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each year and any election on the proposal shall be conducted by the county clerk and recorder in accordance with the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S.

All revenues collected from a county sales tax imposed pursuant to this section shall be credited to a special fund in the county treasury known as the county mental health care services fund. The fund shall be used only for the purpose of providing mental health-care services in accordance with this section.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 1042, § 5, effective June 2.

L. 2008:

(3)(a) amended, p. 991, § 8, effective August 5.

29-2-104. Adoption procedures.

A proposal for a countywide sales tax, use tax, or both shall be referred to the registered electors of the county either by resolution of the board of county commissioners or by petition initiated and signed by five percent of the registered electors of the county. The right of petition allowed pursuant to this subsection (1) shall extend only to the initial proposal of a tax and shall not extend to the extension of an expiring tax, use of tax revenues, or changes in distribution of tax revenues among local governments.

Such proposal shall contain a description of the tax in accordance with the provisions of this article and shall make provision for any distribution of revenue collections between the county and the incorporated cities and towns within the county. Such proposal shall also state the amount of tax to be imposed. Unless otherwise agreed to by the governing bodies of the county and municipalities within the county, any use tax proceeds shall be distributed among such county and municipalities in the same proportion as the sales tax proceeds distributed to each jurisdiction.

A proposal for a countywide sales tax, use tax, or both, by resolution of the board of county commissioners, shall be submitted at the next regular general election if there is one within the next succeeding one hundred twenty days after the adoption of such resolution. If no general election is scheduled within such time, the board of county commissioners, in its resolution, shall submit the same to the registered electors of the county at a special election called for the purpose, to be held not less than thirty days nor more than ninety days after the adoption of such resolution.

Upon being presented with a petition requesting a proposal for a countywide sales tax, use tax, or both signed by five percent of the registered electors of the county, the board of county commissioners shall, upon certification of the signatures on the petition, submit such proposal to the registered electors of the county. The proposal shall be submitted at the next general election if there is one within one hundred twenty days of the filing of the petition. If no general election is scheduled within one hundred twenty days following the date of filing of the petition, the board of county commissioners shall submit such proposal at a special election called not less than thirty days nor more than ninety days from the date of filing of the petition.

Upon the adoption of a resolution by the board of county commissioners as provided in subsection (3) of this section or upon the filing of a proper petition as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the county clerk and recorder shall publish the text of such proposal for a sales tax, use tax, or both four separate times, a week apart, in the official newspaper of the county and each city and incorporated town within the county. The cost of the election shall be paid from the general fund of the county. The conduct of the election shall conform, so far as practicable, to the general election laws of the state.

If approved by a majority of the registered electors voting thereon, the countywide sales tax, use tax, or both shall become effective as provided by section 29-2-106 (2).

If a majority of the registered electors voting thereon fail to approve the countywide sales tax, use tax, or both at any election, the question shall not be submitted again to the registered electors for a period of one year three hundred fifty days.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 660, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 138-10-4.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 962, § 4, effective July 14.

L. 79:

(1)(d) amended, p. 1127, § 3, effective July 3.

L. 81:

(7) amended, p. 1402, § 1, effective June 9.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1944, § 1, effective August 7.

29-2-105. Contents of sales tax ordinances and proposals.

The sales tax ordinance or proposal of any incorporated town, city, or county adopted pursuant to this article 2 shall be imposed on the sale of tangible personal property at retail or the furnishing of services, as provided in subsection (1)(d) of this section. Any countywide or incorporated town or city sales tax ordinance or proposal shall include the following provisions:

A provision imposing a tax on the sale of tangible personal property at retail or the furnishing of services, as provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection (1);

A provision that, for the purpose of the sales tax ordinance or proposal enacted in accordance with this article 2, all retail sales are sourced as specified in section 39-26-104 (3);

A provision that the amount subject to tax shall not include the amount of any sales or use tax imposed by article 26 of title 39, C.R.S.;

A provision that the sale of tangible personal property and services taxable pursuant to this article 2 is the same as the sale of tangible personal property and services taxable pursuant to section 39-26-104, except as otherwise provided in this subsection (1)(d). The sale of tangible personal property and services taxable pursuant to this article 2 is subject to the same sales tax exemptions as those specified in part 7 of article 26 of title 39; except that the sale of the following may be exempted from a town, city, or county sales tax only by the express inclusion of the exemption either at the time of adoption of the initial sales tax ordinance or resolution or by amendment thereto:

The exemption for sales of machinery or machine tools specified in section 39-26-709 (1), C.R.S., other than machinery or machine tools used in the processing of recovered materials by a business listed in the inventory prepared by the department of public health and environment pursuant to section 30-20-122 (1)(a)(V), C.R.S.;

(A.5) The exemption for sales of machinery or machine tools specified in section 39-26-709 (1), C.R.S., used in the processing of recovered materials by a business listed in the inventory prepared by the department of public health and environment pursuant to section 30-20-122 (1)(a)(V), C.R.S.;

The exemption for sales of electricity, coal, wood, gas, fuel oil, or coke specified in section 39-26-715 (1)(a)(II), C.R.S.;

The exemption for sales of food specified in section 39-26-707 (1)(e), C.R.S.;

The exemption for vending machine sales of food specified in section 39-26-714 (2), C.R.S.;

The exemption for sales by a charitable organization specified in section 39-26-718 (1)(b), C.R.S.;

The exemption for sales of farm equipment and farm equipment under lease or contract specified in section 39-26-716 (4)(e) and (4)(f). The express inclusion of the exemption by a town, city, or county before August 2, 2019, does not exempt from the town, city, or county sales tax any visual, electronic identification, or matched pair ear tags and electronic identification readers used to scan ear tags that are used by a farm operator to identify or track food animals, including animals used for food or in the production of food, that were added to the definition of "farm equipment" set forth in section 39-26-716 (1)(d) by House Bill 19-1162, enacted in 2019, and thereby exempted from state sales and use taxes but such a town, city, or county may expressly exempt such items by a subsequent amendment to its sales tax ordinance or resolution.

The exemption for sales of motor vehicles, power sources, or parts used for converting such power sources as specified in section 39-26-719 (1);

Repealed.

The exemption for sales of wood from salvaged trees killed or infested in Colorado by mountain pine beetles or spruce beetles as specified in section 39-26-723, C.R.S.;

The exemption for sales of components used in the production of energy, including but not limited to alternating current electricity, from a renewable energy source specified in section 39-26-724, C.R.S.; except that this sub-subparagraph (J) shall not apply to any incorporated town, city, or county that adopted the exemption specified in sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (I) prior to May 27, 2008;

The exemption for sales that benefit a Colorado school specified in section 39-26-725, C.R.S.;

The exemption for sales by an association or organization of parents and teachers of public school students that is a charitable organization as specified in section 39-26-718 (1)(c), C.R.S.;

The exemption for sales of property for use in space flight specified in section 39-26-728, C.R.S.;

Repealed.

The exemption for retail sales of marijuana upon which the retail marijuana sales tax is imposed pursuant to section 39-28.8-202 as specified in section 39-26-729;

The exemption for manufactured homes and tiny homes set forth in section 39-26-721 (3);

The exemption for sales of period products as specified in section 39-26-717 (2)(m);

The exemption for sales of incontinence products and diapers as specified in section 39-26-717 (2)(n);

The exemption for sales of eligible decarbonizing building materials set forth in section 39-26-731;

The exemption for sales of heat pump systems and heat pump water heaters set forth in section 39-26-732; and

The exemption for sales of energy storage systems set forth in section 39-26-733.

Repealed.

In the absence of an express provision for any exemption specified in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (d), all sales tax ordinances and resolutions shall be construed as imposing or continuing to impose the town, city, or county sales tax on such items.

A provision that all sales of personal property on which a specific ownership tax has been paid or is payable shall be exempt from said county, town, or city sales tax when such sales meet both of the following conditions:

The purchaser is a nonresident of or has his principal place of business outside of the local taxing entity; and

Such personal property is registered or required to be registered outside the limits of the local taxing entity under the laws of this state.

Repealed.

(1.5) (a) All sales tax ordinances or resolutions adopted by a county, town, or city prior to, on, or after August 1, 2002, that impose a sales tax pursuant to section 39-26-104 (1)(c), C.R.S., on a mobile telecommunications service shall impose such tax in accordance with the provisions of the act, and, pursuant to section 117 (b) of the act, mobile telecommunications service taxable by the county, town, or city on or after August 1, 2002, may be subject to any sales tax or other charge imposed by said entity on the service only if the customer's place of primary use is within the geographical boundaries of the entity.

As used in this subsection (1.5), unless the context otherwise requires:

"Act" means the federal "Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act", 4 U.S.C. secs. 116 to 126, as amended.

"Customer" means customer as defined in section 124 (2) of the act.

"Mobile telecommunications service" means mobile telecommunications service as defined in section 124 (7) of the act.

"Place of primary use" means the place of primary use as defined in section 124 (8) of the act.

No sales tax of any statutory or home rule city, town, city and county, or county shall apply to the sale of construction and building materials, as the term is used in section 29-2-109, if the purchaser of such materials presents to the retailer a building permit or other documentation acceptable to such local government evidencing that a local use tax has been paid or is required to be paid.

No sales tax of any statutory or home rule county shall apply to the sale of tangible personal property at retail or the furnishing of services if the transaction was previously subjected to a sales or use tax lawfully imposed on the purchaser or user by another statutory or home rule county equal to or in excess of that sought to be imposed by the subsequent statutory or home rule county. A credit shall be granted against the sales tax imposed by the subsequent statutory or home rule county with respect to such transaction equal in amount to the lawfully imposed local sales or use tax previously paid by the purchaser or user to the previous statutory or home rule county. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the sales tax imposed by the subsequent statutory or home rule county.

No sales tax of any statutory or home rule city and county, city, or town shall apply to the sale of tangible personal property at retail or the furnishing of services if the transaction was previously subjected to a sales or use tax lawfully imposed on the purchaser or user by another statutory or home rule city and county, city, or town equal to or in excess of that sought to be imposed by the subsequent statutory or home rule city and county, city, or town. A credit shall be granted against the sales tax imposed by the subsequent statutory or home rule city and county, city, or town with respect to such transaction equal in amount to the lawfully imposed local sales or use tax previously paid by the purchaser or user to the previous statutory or home rule city and county, city, or town. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the sales tax imposed by the subsequent statutory or home rule city and county, city, or town.

The following provision shall apply in defining the applicability of its higher rate to the sales tax ordinance or resolution of any statutory or home rule city, town, city and county, or county which provides a higher rate of taxation on prepared food or food for immediate consumption than its general rate of taxation: Prepared food or food for immediate consumption shall exclude any food for domestic home consumption.

No sales or use tax of any statutory or home rule city, town, city and county, or county shall apply to the sale of food purchased with food stamps. For the purposes of this subsection (6), "food" shall have the same meaning as provided in 7 U.S.C. sec. 2012 (g), as such section exists on October 1, 1987, or is thereafter amended.

No sales or use tax of any statutory or home rule city, town, city and county, or county shall apply to the sale of food purchased with funds provided by the special supplemental food program for women, infants, and children, 42 U.S.C. sec. 1786. For the purposes of this subsection (7), "food" shall have the same meaning as provided in 42 U.S.C. sec. 1786, as such section exists on October 1, 1987, or is thereafter amended.

Any statutory or home rule city, town, city and county, or county which provides an exemption for the sale of food shall define "food" as defined in section 39-26-102 (4.5), C.R.S.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, sales of cigarettes shall be exempt from a town, city, county, or city and county sales tax that is created pursuant to the authority set forth in this article.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, and except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (10), a town, city, or county may exempt from its sales tax sales to a telecommunications provider of equipment used directly in the provision of telephone service, cable television service, broadband communications service, or mobile telecommunications service.

A town, city, or county may not adopt a sales tax exemption pursuant to the authority set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (10) unless the exemption applies in a uniform and nondiscriminatory manner to the telecommunications providers of telephone service, cable television service, broadband communications service, and mobile telecommunications service.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 661, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 138-10-5.

L. 69:

pp. 1145, 1146, §§ 1, 1.

L. 73:

p. 242, § 26.

L. 77:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1398, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(1)(d) amended, p. 1429, § 13, effective July 3.

L. 80:

(1)(d) amended, p. 684, § 7, effective May 1; (1)(d) amended, p. 734, § 4, effective May 2; (1)(d) amended, p. 799, § 68, effective June 5.

L. 81:

(1) amended and (1)(f) added, p. 1402, § 2, effective June 9.

L. 83:

(1)(d) amended, p. 1208, § 1, effective April 28.

L. 85:

(2), (3), and (4) added, p. 1030, § 1, effective January 1, 1986.

L. 87:

(5) to (8) added, p. 1462, effective October 1.

L. 94:

(1)(d) amended, p. 1325, § 7, effective May 25.

L. 95:

(1)(d) amended, p. 329, § 2, effective April 27.

L. 99:

(1)(d) amended, p. 980, § 3, effective May 28; (1)(d) amended, p. 1324, § 5, effective July 1; (1)(d) amended, p. 1275, § 3, effective July 1; (1)(d) amended, p. 1356, § 4, effective January 1, 2000.

L. 2000:

(1)(d) amended, p. 550, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1)(d) amended, p. 382, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1.5) added, p. 253, § 3, effective April 12; (1)(f) amended, p. 1036, § 81, effective June 1.

L. 2004:

(1)(d) amended, p. 1036, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(d) R&RE, p. 1321, § 5, effective May 27; (1)(d) R&RE, p. 1545, § 3, effective May 28; (1)(d) R&RE, p. 967, § 1, effective August 5; (1)(f) repealed, p. 991, § 9, effective August 5; (1)(d) R&RE, p. 971, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2009:

(1)(d)(I)(J) amended, (HB 09-1126), ch. 254, p. 1149, § 4, effective May 15; (9) added, (HB 09-1342), ch. 354, p. 1847, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(1)(d)(II) repealed, (SB 11-178), ch. 216, p. 945, § 1, effective August 10; (10) added, (HB 11-1109), ch. 221, p. 954, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(1)(d)(I)(I) amended, (HB 12-1045), ch. 191, p. 765, § 2, effective May 21; (1)(d)(I)(H) amended, (HB 12-1037), ch. 251, p. 1247, § 1, effective June 4.

L. 2014:

(1)(d)(I)(N) added, (HB 14-1159), ch. 229, p. 852, § 2, effective May 17; (1)(d)(I)(K) and (1)(d)(I)(L) amended and (1)(d)(I)(M) added, (HB 14-1178), ch. 234, p. 867, § 3, effective May 20.

L. 2016:

(1)(d)(I)(A) amended and (1)(d)(I)(A.5) added, (SB 16-124), ch. 258, p. 1058, § 2, effective June 8.

L. 2017:

IP(1) and IP(1)(d)(I) amended and (1)(d)(I)(O) added, (SB 17-267), ch. 267, p. 1467, § 23, effective May 30.

L. 2018:

IP(1) and IP(1)(d)(I) amended and (1)(d)(I)(P) added, (HB 18-1315), ch. 240, p. 1496, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(1)(b) and (2) amended, (HB 19-1240), ch. 264, p. 2502, § 9, effective June 1; (1)(d)(I)(F) amended, (HB 19-1162), ch. 266, p. 2511, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(1)(d)(I)(G) amended, (HB 21-1155), ch. 109, p. 433, § 2, effective May 7; (1)(d)(I)(F) amended, (HB 21-1158), ch. 119, p. 458, § 3, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

IP(1)(d)(I) and (1)(d)(I)(P) amended, (HB 22-1242), ch. 172, p. 1139, § 36, effective August 10; (1)(d)(I)(Q) and (1)(d)(I)(R) added, (HB 22-1055), ch. 359, p. 2574, § 2, effective August 10; (1)(d)(I)(S), (1)(d)(I)(T), and (1)(d)(I)(U) added, (SB 22-051), ch. 333, p. 2359, § 6, effective August 10.